Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1405
Ballot question, defined.

(1) Ballot
question shall mean any question which is submitted or which is intended to
be submitted to a popular vote at an election, including, but not limited
to, a question submitted or intended to be submitted by way of initiative,
referendum, recall, or judicial
retention, whether
or not it qualifies for the ballot.

(2) Ballot question shall
also mean any question which has been submitted to a popular vote at an election
as a result of legislative action or adoption of a resolution by a political
subdivision to place an issue or issues on the ballot.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 534, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 632, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB626, § 2.